Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 4. Fees

§ 2-2-401.
Schedule; additional charges.

For probate matters filed or commenced, the clerk of the district court shall collect fees as follows:

Original filing fee . . . . . $110.00

When an inventory or appraisement is filed showing an estate or guardianship valued at five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or more, additional fees based upon value shall be collected as follows:

Value five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) to ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00) . . . . . $5.00

Each additional ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) of
value or portion thereof . . . . . $5.00

In addition to the original filing fee under paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection, a court automation fee in the amount of forty dollars ($40.00) which shall be deposited into the judicial systems automation account established by W.S.

5-2-120

;

In addition to the original filing fee under paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection, an indigent civil legal services fee in the amount of ten dollars ($10.00), which shall be deposited into the indigent civil legal services account established by W.S.

5-2-121

.

The original filing fee shall cover the general filing activity of the clerk’s office and a certification of one (1) copy of any order, decree or judgment at the time of its filing for each party. Other copy charges and certification fees shall be assessed at the same amount as established for other business of the court.

Additional fees or charges may be assessed for particular matters as ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 171, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(iv).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iii), substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00).”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(i), substituted “$110.00” for “$50.00,” and in (a)(iii), substituted “thirty dollars ($30.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iii) substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “thirty dollars ($30.00).”

§ 2-2-402.
Responsibility of clerk for collection; distribution.

The clerk of the district court of each county is responsible upon his bond for the collection or payment of any fees in probate matters which are to be collected by him or when the court orders fees to be paid to the clerk for fees not specially provided for in W.S.

2-2-401

. All of the fees shall be paid to the county treasurer at the end of each month.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 75, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 5453; C.S. 1920, § 6725; R.S. 1931, § 88-802; C.S. 1945, § 6-2802; Laws 1951, ch. 154, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 2-31; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-302

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-2-403.
Allowance where not specially provided.

When there are no fees specially provided for the performance of any duty under the Probate Code, reasonable fees may be ordered and allowed as the court may deem best.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 27, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4540; C.S. 1910, § 5456; C.S. 1920, § 6728; R.S. 1931, § 88-805; C.S. 1945, § 6-2805; W.S. 1957, § 2-34; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-305

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to schedule of fees, see §

2-2-401

.

Meaning of “Probate Code.” —

The term “Probate Code” refers to the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

.

§ 2-2-404.
Payment of court commissioner.

The court commissioner, in performing the duties prescribed by the Probate Code, shall receive the following fees in full payment for all services, which shall be taxed as costs against the estate:

For attending any matter, five dollars ($5.00) per day for the time actually employed in hearing the matter;

For each order made by him, three dollars ($3.00);

For all other services he shall receive the same fees which clerks of courts receive for similar services.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 27, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4541; C.S. 1910, § 5457; Laws 1919, ch. 23, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 6729; R.S. 1931, § 88-806; C.S. 1945, § 6-2806; W.S. 1957, § 2-35; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-306

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to court commissioners generally, see §§

5-3-301

to

5-3-312

.

Meaning of “Probate Code.” —

The term “Probate Code” refers to the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section held inapplicable to certain proceedings. —

This section was held not to fix or control court commissioner's compensation or that of a special master commissioner in taking evidence, making findings and reporting them in a cause or proceeding brought in district court under the Code of Civil Procedure. Weltner v. Thurmond, 17 Wyo. 310, 98 P. 601,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1908), rehearing denied, 17 Wyo. 268, 98 P. 590, 99 P. 1128,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1909). As to the applicability of the Code of Civil Procedure generally, see §

2-2-308

.